Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.128

Notice and disclosure policies—Threats of violence—Student conduct—Immunity for good faith notice—Penalty.

(1) By September 1, 2020, each school district board of directors shall adopt a policy that addresses the following issues:

(a) Procedures for providing notice of threats of violence or harm to the student or school employee who is the subject of the threat. The policy shall define "threats of violence or harm"; and

(b) Procedures for complying with the notification provisions in RCW 28A.320.163.

(2) The Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with educators and representatives of law enforcement, classified staff, organizations with expertise in violence prevention and intervention, and organizations that provide free legal services for youth, shall adopt, and revise as necessary, a model policy that includes the issues listed in subsection (1) of this section. The model policy shall be disseminated by the Washington state school directors' association and made available to the public on its website. Each school district shall adopt the model policy required by this subsection unless it has a compelling reason to develop and adopt a different policy that also addresses the issues identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) School districts, school district boards of directors, school officials, and school employees providing notice in good faith as required and consistent with the board's policies adopted under this section are immune from any liability arising out of such notification.

(4) A person who intentionally and in bad faith or maliciously, knowingly makes a false notification of a threat under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2020 c 167 s 4; 2002 c 206 s 1.]